Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-163
Insurer; transfer of domicile; effect on business; filing requirements.

The certificate of authority, agents' appointments, licenses, rates, and other items which the Director of Insurance allows, in his or her discretion, which are in existence at the time any insurer licensed to transact the business of insurance in this state transfers its domicile to this or any other state by merger, consolidation, or any other lawful method, shall continue in full force and effect upon such transfer if such insurer remains duly qualified to transact the business of insurance in this state. All outstanding policies of any transferring insurer shall remain in full force and effect and need not be endorsed as to the new name of the company or its new location unless so ordered by the director. Every transferring insurer shall file new policy forms with the director on or before the effective date of the transfer but may use existing policy forms with appropriate endorsements if allowed by and under such conditions as approved by the director. Every such transferring insurer shall file promptly and shall notify the director of the details of the proposed transfer and resulting amendments to corporate documents filed or required to be filed with the director.

Laws 1989, LB 61, § 3.